Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.141

Duty of officers collecting moneys.

Every officer collecting or receiving any money belonging to or for the use of the city shall settle with the clerk and immediately pay it into the treasury on the order of the clerk to be credited to the fund to which it belongs.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.24.140. Prior: 1915 c 184 s 30; 1890 p 197 s 139; RRS s 9144. Formerly RCW 35.24.140.]